Rhode Island, session 2025, SB198.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 5-40-23 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-40 entitled "Physical
Therapists" is hereby amended to read as follows:
5-40-23. Ordering diagnostic imaging — Sunset Ordering diagnostic imaging.
(a) Physical therapists licensed pursuant to § 5-40-7 may order diagnostic imaging as
defined in § 5-40-1 to be performed and interpreted by other licensed healthcare professionals.
(b) All diagnostic imaging tests ordered by a physical therapist shall be reported by the
physical therapist to the patient’s designated primary care physician of record within seven (7) days
following receipt of the results. This reporting shall not be required if the patient does not have a
primary care physician.
(c) Managed healthcare plans shall provide a utilization report to the general assembly no
later than September 1, 2022, and annually thereafter.
(d) Unless extended by the general assembly, physical therapists shall not be authorized to
order diagnostic imaging as an authorized practice of physical therapy after December 31, 2025.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001154
========